Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8505
Brochure or written material; available
to customer; contents; certificate of insurance; powers of insurer.

(1) At each
location at which portable electronics insurance is offered to a customer,
a brochure or other written material shall be available to the customer which:

(a) Discloses
the fact that portable electronics insurance may provide a duplication of
coverage already provided by a customer's homeowner's insurance policy, renter's
insurance policy, or other similar insurance coverage;

(b) States
that the enrollment by the customer in a portable electronics insurance coverage
program is not required in order to purchase or lease portable electronics
or services;

(c) Summarizes the material terms of the portable electronics insurance,
including:

(i) The identity of the insurer;

(ii) The identity of the supervising entity;

(iii) The amount
of any applicable deductible and how it is to be paid;

(iv) The benefits
of the coverage; and

(v) The key terms and conditions of the coverage, including whether
portable electronics may be repaired or replaced with a similar reconditioned
make or model or with nonoriginal manufacturer parts or equipment;

(d) Summarizes
the process for filing a claim, including a description of how to return the
portable electronics and the maximum fee applicable if the customer fails
to comply with any equipment return requirements; and

(e) States that the customer
may cancel enrollment for portable electronics insurance coverage at any time
and receive any applicable unearned premium refund on a pro rata basis.

(2) Portable
electronics insurance may be offered on a month-to-month or other periodic
basis as a group or master commercial inland marine policy issued to a vendor
for its covered customers. A covered customer who elects to enroll for coverage
shall receive a certificate of insurance and an explanation of coverage or
instructions on how to obtain such materials upon request.

(3) Eligibility
and underwriting standards for customers who elect to enroll in portable electronics
insurance coverage shall be established by the insurer for each portable electronics
insurance program.

Laws 2011, LB535, § 5.